spanish.foma
		["+V"]:["^"  v a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a y á i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a y a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a y a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a y a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v a y a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v e ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  v o y ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y á i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e n d o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r a i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y é r a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r e i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y é r e m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r e n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r e s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r e ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r o n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r e n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r e s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r e ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e r r o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e s e i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y é s e m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e s e n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e s e s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e s e ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y e ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  y ó ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z á i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c á i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z c o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g á i s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g a m o s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g a n ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g a s ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g a ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z g o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z o ]		|
		["+V"]:["^"  z ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á g e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á i s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á m e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á m i n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a n a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a n a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á n o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a n o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  á r i o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a v a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a v a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a v i t s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a v o ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a v o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a y ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  a y s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  c e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  é d i o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e n d e r s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  é r m i s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e r ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e s a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e s a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  g ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  g o l p e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  H z ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í a c a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í a c a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í a c o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i l e o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í m e n e s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í m e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i n a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i n a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  i s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  í t u s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  l ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  l u m b i o ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  l u m b i o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  m ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ñ o s a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ñ o s a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ñ o s o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó b s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o i ó n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o l d e r s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó l j o s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó l o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó m e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  º ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o n a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o n a s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó n ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o ó n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o q u e i s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o q u e r s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó r d e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó r i o n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o r t e r s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o r u m s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  o s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ó s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  q u e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s d a l g o ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s h o r a ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s i c o s i s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s k í e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s k i ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s k i s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  t z ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ú e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ú m e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ú m p e n e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  u m p e r s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  ú n g u s e s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  u n k e r s ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  w a t t ]		|
		["+N"]:["^"  z ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á m e a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á m e a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á m e o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a n e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á p o d a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á p o d a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  á p o d o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a s a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a s a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  a s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  c e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e n d é s a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e n d é s a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e n d é s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e s a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e s a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  e s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  é s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i a c a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í a c a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i a c a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í a c a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i a c o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í a c o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i c a n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i c a n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i c a n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í g e n e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i m a n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í m a n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i m a n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í m a n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i m a n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  í m a n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i n e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i s e r a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i s e r a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i s e r o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  i s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ o ñ a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ o ñ a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ o ñ o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ u d o s a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ u d o s a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ñ u d o s o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o f i t a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o f i t a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o f i t o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o n e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  ó v e n e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u a n d é s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u a n d e s a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u a n d e s a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u a n d e s e s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u m a n a ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u m a n a s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u m a n o s ]		|
		["+A"]:["^"  u n e s ]		|
		["+V"]:0		|
		["+N"]:0		|
		["+A"]:0];

define V1Deletion  a r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á b a m o s ];
define V2Deletion  e a b r i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a b i e r t a ];
define V3Deletion  e a b r i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a b i e r t a s ];
define V4Deletion  e a b r i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a b i e r t o ];
define V5Deletion  e a b r i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a b i e r t o s ];
define V6Deletion  e r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a ];
define V7Deletion  i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a ];
define V8Deletion  a r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á i s ];
define V9Deletion  e r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á i s ];
define V10Deletion  i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á i s ];
define V11Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a i s ];
define V12Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á i s ];
define V14Deletion  e r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a m o s ];
define V15Deletion  i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a m o s ];
define V16Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a m o s ];
define V17Deletion  e r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a n ];
define V18Deletion  i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a n ];
define V19Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a n ];
define V22Deletion  a r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á r a m o s ];
define V23Deletion  a r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á r e m o s ];
define V24Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a ];
define V25Deletion  a r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  á s e m o s ];
define V26Deletion  e r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a s ];
define V27Deletion  i r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a s ];
define V28Deletion  r  -> 0 || _ "^" [  a s ];
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex		GuessLexicon .o. 
		V1Deletion .o. 
		V2Deletion .o. 
		V3Deletion .o. 
		V4Deletion .o. 
		V5Deletion .o. 
		V6Deletion .o. 
		V7Deletion .o. 
		V8Deletion .o. 
		V9Deletion .o. 
		V10Deletion .o. 
		V11Deletion .o. 
		V12Deletion .o. 
		V14Deletion .o. 
		V15Deletion .o. 
		V16Deletion .o. 
		V17Deletion .o. 
		V18Deletion .o. 
		V19Deletion .o. 
		V22Deletion .o. 
		V23Deletion .o. 
		V24Deletion .o. 
		V25Deletion .o. 
		V26Deletion .o. 
		V27Deletion .o. 
		V28Deletion .o. 
		Cleanup;
